Mississippi, session 2026, SB3294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security not otherwise appropriated, to the department for the purpose of funding Summer Youth Employment Programs throughout the state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 ............................................... $ 10,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that twenty-five (25) high school students from Mound Bayou be employed by programs funded pursuant to this act. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.